District of Columbia statutes.
4-404

Repealed

Supplemental payments by Department.

Repealed.

Sept. 19, 1979, D.C. Law 3-16, § 5, 26 DCR 20
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-163, § 2(b), 29 DCR 3974
June 22, 1990, D.C. Law 8-144, § 3(b), 37 DCR 2974
Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-202, § 3(b), 37 DCR 7937
Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-216, § 2(c), 46 DCR 281
1981 Ed., § 3-304.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 2(c) of Day Care Policy Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-72, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2107).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 5 of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 2(c) of the Day Care Policy Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-509, November 10, 1998, 45 DCR 8146), and § 2(c) of the Day Care Policy Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-12, February 8, 1999, 46 DCR 2330).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 5 of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 5 of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682), § 5 of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 5 of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).
D.C. Law 12-241 purported to substitute “TANF or POWER” for “AFDC” in (6); however, the repeal by D.C. Law 12-216, § 2(c) has been given effect herein.